New York, session 2025-2026, S7555.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Sections 1, 2, 3 and 7 of chapter 187 of the laws of 1960 2 incorporating the West Islip Exempt Firemen's Benevolent Association, 3 are amended to read as follows: 4 Section 1. Incorporation; membership. A [membership] not-for-profit 5 corporation by the name of "West Islip Exempt [Firemen's] Firefighter's 6 Benevolent Association" is hereby created. It shall be composed of such 7 persons eligible to membership therein as hereinafter provided as shall 8 (a) notify the secretary of the West Islip fire department in writing 9 prior to the organization meeting of such corporation hereinafter 10 provided for their desire to become members, or (b) shall attend such 11 meeting or an adjournment thereof, and also such persons so eligible as 12 may become members of such corporation pursuant to its by-laws. 13 § 2. Persons eligible to membership. All persons who are now, or have 14 been, or who hereafter shall be volunteer members of the West Islip fire 15 district fire department, or of any fire corporation in such fire 16 district, and all persons resident in such fire district or in territory 17 provided with fire protection by contract with such fire district who 18 are exempt volunteer [firemen] firefighters as defined by section [two 19 hundred] 200 of the general municipal law, shall be eligible to member- 20 ship in the corporation hereby created; provided that any person who has 21 been expelled or removed for cause from membership in any fire company 22 or department shall not be eligible to membership in such corporation. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06583-05-5 S. 7555--A 2 1 Whenever a member who is not an exempt [fireman] firefighter as defined 2 by section [two hundred] 200 of the general municipal law shall remove 3 from such fire district or from territory provided with fire protection 4 as aforesaid or if the territory in which a member resides shall no 5 longer be provided with such fire protection, [his] such person's 6 membership in such corporation shall cease. 7 § 3. Purposes. The purposes of such corporation shall be [the mainte- 8 nance of suitable headquarters for, and the promotion of fraternal 9 intercourse among the members of such corporation, the relief, aid and 10 assistance of such members and their families who are disabled or indi- 11 gent, and the promotion of the welfare of the volunteer fire service 12 within the West Islip fire district and territory provided with fire 13 protection by contract with such fire district]: to provide relief, aid 14 and assistance to the volunteer members of such corporation who are 15 disabled, indigent or injured in the performance of their duties, and 16 their families; to promote and safeguard the welfare of the volunteer 17 members of such corporation, and their families; to maintain a suitable 18 headquarters for the members of such corporation; to provide for the 19 health and safety of the volunteer members of such corporation; and the 20 promotion of the volunteer fire service within the territory protected 21 by the West Islip fire district fire department. 22 § 7. Precept for payment of foreign fire insurance premium taxes. Such 23 corporation shall collect and there shall be paid to it all taxes 24 imposed by section [five hundred fifty-three] 9104 of the insurance law, 25 for fire department use and benefit, upon premiums for insurance against 26 loss or damage by fire covering property situated within the territory 27 protected by the West Islip fire department, located in the town of 28 Islip, Suffolk county, New York, or within any duly organized territory 29 in which the West Islip fire department is or may be obligated to render 30 fire protection. The officer of said corporation designated by its 31 by-laws to collect and receive the aforesaid tax shall have all the 32 powers and be subject to all the provisions of the insurance law, relat- 33 ing to treasurers of fire departments. Such corporation shall also be 34 entitled to receive a share of the tax imposed by section [five hundred 35 fifty-four] 9105 of the insurance law, based upon the business written 36 in the territory with respect to which it is entitled to collect and 37 receive the tax under section [five hundred fifty-three] 9104 of the 38 insurance law. Such taxes shall only be used [for the care and relief of 39 disabled or indigent volunteer and exempt volunteer firemen and their 40 families] by the corporation in furtherance of its purposes as set forth 41 in section three of this act. 42 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 43 the amendments to section 7 of chapter 187 of the laws of 1960 made by 44 section one of this act shall apply to taxes due on premiums received on 45 and after January 1, 2026.